Utah statutes.
57-8-13.6.   Expansion of project.

A condominium project may be expanded under the provisions of the declaration and of this act.  Any such expansion shall be deemed to have occurred at the time of the recordation of the condominium plat under Subsection 57-8-13(2), together with an amendment to the declaration, duly executed and acknowledged by the declarant, including, without limitation, all of the owners and lessees of the additional land added to the condominium project.  The amendment shall contain a legal description by metes and bounds of the land added to the condominium project and shall reallocate undivided interests in the common areas and facilities in accordance with Subsection 57-8-13.10(2).



Amended by Chapter 265, 2003 General Session

